test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NA_A_NoExtra_nika_gt-norm.yaml
     +Px3nika+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: onikaishinaaniban
     +Px3nika+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: onikaishinaan***idig, idog***
     +Px3nika+Pej+PosPl+Pret: onikaishiwaaiban
     +Px3nika+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: onikaishiwaa***idig, idog***
     +Px3nika+Pej+PosObv+Pret: onikaishiniiban
     +Px3nika+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: onikaishini***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5, 7
     +Px1nika+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: ninikaishinaanan
     +Px1nika+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: ninikaishinaanag
     +Px1nika+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: ninikaishinaaning
     +Px1nika+Pej+PosPl+Obv: ninikaishiwaaan
     +Px1nika+Pej+PosPl+Pl: ninikaishiwaaag
     +Px1nika+Pej+PosPl+Loc: ninikaishiwaaing
     +Px1nika+Pej+PosObv+Obv: ninikaishinian
     +Px1nika+Pej+PosObv+Pl: ninikaishiniag
     +Px1nika+Pej+PosObv+Loc: ninikaishiniing
     +Px2nika+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: ginikaishinaanan
     +Px2nika+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: ginikaishinaanag
     +Px2nika+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: ginikaishinaaning
     +Px2nika+Pej+PosPl+Obv: ginikaishiwaaan
     +Px2nika+Pej+PosPl+Pl: ginikaishiwaaag
     +Px2nika+Pej+PosPl+Loc: ginikaishiwaaing
     +Px2nika+Pej+PosObv+Obv: ginikaishinian
     +Px2nika+Pej+PosObv+Pl: ginikaishiniag
     +Px2nika+Pej+PosObv+Loc: ginikaishiniing
     +Px3nika+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: onikaishinaanan
     +Px3nika+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: onikaishinaanag
     +Px3nika+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: onikaishinaaning
     +Px3nika+Pej+PosPl+Obv: onikaishiwaaan
     +Px3nika+Pej+PosPl+Pl: onikaishiwaaag
     +Px3nika+Pej+PosPl+Loc: onikaishiwaaing
     +Px3nika+Pej+PosObv+Obv: onikaishinian
     +Px3nika+Pej+PosObv+Pl: onikaishiniag
     +Px3nika+Pej+PosObv+Loc: onikaishiniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 6, 7
     +Px1nika+Pej+Pret+Obv: ninikaishibanan
     +Px1nika+Pej+Pret+Pl: ninikaishibanag
     +Px1nika+Pej+Pret+Loc: ninikaishibaning
     +Px1nika+Pej+VocPl+Obv: ninikaish***idig, idog***an
     +Px1nika+Pej+VocPl+Pl: ninikaish***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1nika+Pej+VocPl+Loc: ninikaish***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2nika+Pej+Pret+Obv: ginikaishibanan
     +Px2nika+Pej+Pret+Pl: ginikaishibanag
     +Px2nika+Pej+Pret+Loc: ginikaishibaning
     +Px2nika+Pej+VocPl+Obv: ginikaish***idig, idog***an
     +Px2nika+Pej+VocPl+Pl: ginikaish***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2nika+Pej+VocPl+Loc: ginikaish***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3nika+Pej+Pret+Obv: onikaishibanan
     +Px3nika+Pej+Pret+Pl: onikaishibanag
     +Px3nika+Pej+Pret+Loc: onikaishibaning
     +Px3nika+Pej+VocPl+Obv: onikaish***idig, idog***an
     +Px3nika+Pej+VocPl+Pl: onikaish***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3nika+Pej+VocPl+Loc: onikaish***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5, 6, 7
     +Px1nika+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: ninikainaanibanan
     +Px1nika+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: ninikainaanibanag
     +Px1nika+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: ninikainaanibaning
     +Px1nika+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: ninikainaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px1nika+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: ninikainaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1nika+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: ninikainaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px1nika+PosPl+Pret+Obv: ninikaiwaaibanan
     +Px1nika+PosPl+Pret+Pl: ninikaiwaaibanag
     +Px1nika+PosPl+Pret+Loc: ninikaiwaaibaning
     +Px1nika+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: ninikaiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px1nika+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: ninikaiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1nika+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: ninikaiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px1nika+PosObv+Pret+Obv: ninikainiibanan
     +Px1nika+PosObv+Pret+Pl: ninikainiibanag
     +Px1nika+PosObv+Pret+Loc: ninikainiibaning
     +Px1nika+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: ninikaini***idig, idog***an
     +Px1nika+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: ninikaini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1nika+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: ninikaini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2nika+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: ginikainaanibanan
     +Px2nika+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: ginikainaanibanag
     +Px2nika+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: ginikainaanibaning
     +Px2nika+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: ginikainaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px2nika+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: ginikainaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2nika+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: ginikainaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2nika+PosPl+Pret+Obv: ginikaiwaaibanan
     +Px2nika+PosPl+Pret+Pl: ginikaiwaaibanag
     +Px2nika+PosPl+Pret+Loc: ginikaiwaaibaning
     +Px2nika+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: ginikaiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px2nika+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: ginikaiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2nika+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: ginikaiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2nika+PosObv+Pret+Obv: ginikainiibanan
     +Px2nika+PosObv+Pret+Pl: ginikainiibanag
     +Px2nika+PosObv+Pret+Loc: ginikainiibaning
     +Px2nika+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: ginikaini***idig, idog***an
     +Px2nika+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: ginikaini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2nika+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: ginikaini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3nika+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: onikainaanibanan
     +Px3nika+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: onikainaanibanag
     +Px3nika+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: onikainaanibaning
     +Px3nika+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: onikainaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px3nika+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: onikainaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3nika+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: onikainaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3nika+PosPl+Pret+Obv: onikaiwaaibanan
     +Px3nika+PosPl+Pret+Pl: onikaiwaaibanag
     +Px3nika+PosPl+Pret+Loc: onikaiwaaibaning
     +Px3nika+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: onikaiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px3nika+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: onikaiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3nika+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: onikaiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3nika+PosObv+Pret+Obv: onikainiibanan
     +Px3nika+PosObv+Pret+Pl: onikainiibanag
     +Px3nika+PosObv+Pret+Loc: onikainiibaning
     +Px3nika+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: onikaini***idig, idog***an
     +Px3nika+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: onikaini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3nika+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: onikaini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 5
     nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: nikaensimishinaan
     nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl: nikaensimishiwaa
     nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv: nikaensimishini
     nika+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: nikaenhimishinaan
     nika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl: nikaenhimishiwaa
     nika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv: nikaenhimishini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 6
     nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret: nikaensimishiban
     nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl: nikaensimish***idig, idog***
     nika+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret: nikaenhimishiban
     nika+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl: nikaenhimish***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 7
     nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+Obv: nikaensimishan
     nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pl: nikaensimishag
     nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+Loc: nikaensimishing
     nika+Con+Pos+Pej+Obv: nikaenhimishan
     nika+Con+Pos+Pej+Pl: nikaenhimishag
     nika+Con+Pos+Pej+Loc: nikaenhimishing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 5, 6
     nika+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret: nikaensiminaaniban
     nika+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl: nikaensiminaan***idig, idog***
     nika+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pret: nikaensimiwaaiban
     nika+Dim+Pos+PosPl+VocPl: nikaensimiwaa***idig, idog***
     nika+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pret: nikaensiminiiban
     nika+Dim+Pos+PosObv+VocPl: nikaensimini***idig, idog***
     nika+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret: nikaenhiminaaniban
     nika+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl: nikaenhiminaan***idig, idog***
     nika+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pret: nikaenhimiwaaiban
     nika+Con+Pos+PosPl+VocPl: nikaenhimiwaa***idig, idog***
     nika+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pret: nikaenhiminiiban
     nika+Con+Pos+PosObv+VocPl: nikaenhimini***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 5, 7
     nika+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Obv: nikaensiminaanan
     nika+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pl: nikaensiminaanag
     nika+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Loc: nikaensiminaaning
     nika+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Obv: nikaensimiwaaan
     nika+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pl: nikaensimiwaaag
     nika+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Loc: nikaensimiwaaing
     nika+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Obv: nikaensiminian
     nika+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pl: nikaensiminiag
     nika+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Loc: nikaensiminiing
     nika+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Obv: nikaenhiminaanan
     nika+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pl: nikaenhiminaanag
     nika+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Loc: nikaenhiminaaning
     nika+Con+Pos+PosPl+Obv: nikaenhimiwaaan
     nika+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pl: nikaenhimiwaaag
     nika+Con+Pos+PosPl+Loc: nikaenhimiwaaing
     nika+Con+Pos+PosObv+Obv: nikaenhiminian
     nika+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pl: nikaenhiminiag
     nika+Con+Pos+PosObv+Loc: nikaenhiminiing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 6, 7
     nika+Dim+Pos+Pret+Obv: nikaensimibanan
     nika+Dim+Pos+Pret+Pl: nikaensimibanag
     nika+Dim+Pos+Pret+Loc: nikaensimibaning
     nika+Dim+Pos+VocPl+Obv: nikaensim***idig, idog***an
     nika+Dim+Pos+VocPl+Pl: nikaensim***idig, idog***ag
     nika+Dim+Pos+VocPl+Loc: nikaensim***idig, idog***ing
     nika+Con+Pos+Pret+Obv: nikaenhimibanan
     nika+Con+Pos+Pret+Pl: nikaenhimibanag
     nika+Con+Pos+Pret+Loc: nikaenhimibaning
     nika+Con+Pos+VocPl+Obv: nikaenhim***idig, idog***an
     nika+Con+Pos+VocPl+Pl: nikaenhim***idig, idog***ag
     nika+Con+Pos+VocPl+Loc: nikaenhim***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 5, 6
     nika+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: nikaensishinaaniban
     nika+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: nikaensishinaan***idig, idog***
     nika+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Pret: nikaensishiwaaiban
     nika+Dim+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: nikaensishiwaa***idig, idog***
     nika+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Pret: nikaensishiniiban
     nika+Dim+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: nikaensishini***idig, idog***
     nika+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: nikaenhishinaaniban
     nika+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: nikaenhishinaan***idig, idog***
     nika+Con+Pej+PosPl+Pret: nikaenhishiwaaiban
     nika+Con+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: nikaenhishiwaa***idig, idog***
     nika+Con+Pej+PosObv+Pret: nikaenhishiniiban
     nika+Con+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: nikaenhishini***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 5, 7
     nika+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: nikaensishinaanan
     nika+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: nikaensishinaanag
     nika+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: nikaensishinaaning
     nika+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Obv: nikaensishiwaaan
     nika+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Pl: nikaensishiwaaag
     nika+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Loc: nikaensishiwaaing
     nika+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Obv: nikaensishinian
     nika+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Pl: nikaensishiniag
     nika+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Loc: nikaensishiniing
     nika+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: nikaenhishinaanan
     nika+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: nikaenhishinaanag
     nika+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: nikaenhishinaaning
     nika+Con+Pej+PosPl+Obv: nikaenhishiwaaan
     nika+Con+Pej+PosPl+Pl: nikaenhishiwaaag
     nika+Con+Pej+PosPl+Loc: nikaenhishiwaaing
     nika+Con+Pej+PosObv+Obv: nikaenhishinian
     nika+Con+Pej+PosObv+Pl: nikaenhishiniag
     nika+Con+Pej+PosObv+Loc: nikaenhishiniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 6, 7
     nika+Dim+Pej+Pret+Obv: nikaensishibanan
     nika+Dim+Pej+Pret+Pl: nikaensishibanag
     nika+Dim+Pej+Pret+Loc: nikaensishibaning
     nika+Dim+Pej+VocPl+Obv: nikaensish***idig, idog***an
     nika+Dim+Pej+VocPl+Pl: nikaensish***idig, idog***ag
     nika+Dim+Pej+VocPl+Loc: nikaensish***idig, idog***ing
     nika+Con+Pej+Pret+Obv: nikaenhishibanan
     nika+Con+Pej+Pret+Pl: nikaenhishibanag
     nika+Con+Pej+Pret+Loc: nikaenhishibaning
     nika+Con+Pej+VocPl+Obv: nikaenhish***idig, idog***an
     nika+Con+Pej+VocPl+Pl: nikaenhish***idig, idog***ag
     nika+Con+Pej+VocPl+Loc: nikaenhish***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 5, 6, 7
     nika+Dim+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: nikaensinaanibanan
     nika+Dim+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: nikaensinaanibanag
     nika+Dim+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: nikaensinaanibaning
     nika+Dim+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: nikaensinaan***idig, idog***an
     nika+Dim+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: nikaensinaan***idig, idog***ag
     nika+Dim+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: nikaensinaan***idig, idog***ing
     nika+Dim+PosPl+Pret+Obv: nikaensiwaaibanan
     nika+Dim+PosPl+Pret+Pl: nikaensiwaaibanag
     nika+Dim+PosPl+Pret+Loc: nikaensiwaaibaning
     nika+Dim+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: nikaensiwaa***idig, idog***an
     nika+Dim+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: nikaensiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     nika+Dim+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: nikaensiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     nika+Dim+PosObv+Pret+Obv: nikaensiniibanan
     nika+Dim+PosObv+Pret+Pl: nikaensiniibanag
     nika+Dim+PosObv+Pret+Loc: nikaensiniibaning
     nika+Dim+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: nikaensini***idig, idog***an
     nika+Dim+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: nikaensini***idig, idog***ag
     nika+Dim+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: nikaensini***idig, idog***ing
